Utah statutes.
17B-1-633.   District treasurer -- Duties generally.
(1) (a)  The board of trustees of each local district shall appoint a district
treasurer.
(b) (i) If required, the treasurer may be chosen from among the members of the
board of trustees, except that the board chair may not be district treasurer.
(ii)  The district clerk may not also be the district treasurer.
(2)  The district treasurer is custodian of all money, bonds, or other
securities of the district.
(3)  The district treasurer shall:
(a)  determine the cash requirements of the district and provide for the
deposit and investment of all monies by following the procedures and
requirements of Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act;
(b)  receive all public funds and money payable to the district within three
business days after collection, including all taxes, licenses, fines, and
intergovernmental revenue;
(c)  keep an accurate detailed account of all monies received under Subsection
(3)(b) in the manner provided in this part and as directed by the district's
board of trustees by resolution; and
(d)  collect all special taxes and assessments as provided by law and
ordinance.
